Illinois, session 104th, HB5609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-20.24 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.24)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.24)7    Sec. 10-20.24. Part-time Attendance. 8    (a) The parent or guardian of a child of school age who is 9enrolled in a nonpublic school shall be allowed to enroll the 10student part-time To accept in part-time attendance in the 11regular education program of the district pupils enrolled in 12nonpublic schools if there is sufficient space in the public 13school desired to be attended. Request for part-time 14attendance may in the following school year must be submitted 15by parents the nonpublic school principal to the public school 16at any time before May 1. Request may be made only to any those 17public school in the State schools located in the district 18where the child attending the nonpublic school resides.19    A school board shall To accept, pursuant to the provisions 20of Section 14-6.01, in part-time attendance resident pupils of 21the types described in Sections 14-1.02 through 14-1.07 who 22are enrolled in nonpublic schools.23    (b) The school district that the student attends part-time   HB5609- 2 -LRB104 19787 LNS 33237 b1shall receive State funding for the pupil's participation in 2the public school course or program. A part-time student shall 3not be required to pay fees for the part-time student's 4enrollment or participation in any public school program or 5course, except to the extent that a full-time student is 6required to pay the same fees.7    (c) The parent or guardian of a child of school age who is 8enrolled in a nonpublic school may enroll the child in any 9public school in the child's district of residence on a 10part-time basis for interscholastic extracurricular 11activities. A local school board may not discriminate against 12a child seeking enrollment in interscholastic extracurricular 13activities at a public school based on where the child attends 14school.15    (d) A part-time student seeking to participate in 16interscholastic extracurricular activities at a public school 17the part-time student is enrolled at under this Section may 18participate in any interscholastic extracurricular activity 19available at the public school, subject to meeting the same 20eligibility requirements, responsibilities, and standards of 21behavior and performance as a resident student. A part-time 22student eligible under this Section who participates in an 23interscholastic extracurricular activity under this subsection 24shall pay any participating or activity fee in an amount equal 25to the fee charged to a full-time public school participant.26    (e) Nothing in this Section shall establish authority of a   HB5609- 3 -LRB104 19787 LNS 33237 b1local school district or the State Board of Education to 2regulate an at-home private school student's education.3    (f) No school district or interscholastic athletic 4association may adopt or enforce rules contrary to this 5Section.6    (g) The State Board of Education is authorized to adopt 7rules to implement this Section. 8(Source: P.A. 80-1509.)